Hawaii statutes.
§383-92 Rules and regulations. The
director of labor and industrial relations may adopt, amend, or repeal such
rules and regulations as the director deems necessary or suitable for the
administration of this chapter. The rules and regulations when prescribed in
accordance with chapter 91 shall have the force and effect of law and shall be
enforced in the same manner as this chapter.

Any interested person may petition for an
amendment or repeal of such rule or regulation as provided in section 91-6. [L 1939,
c 219, §10(d); am L 1941, c 304, §1, pt of subs 32; RL 1945, §4270; am L 1951,
c 195, §1(13); RL 1955, §93-91; am L 1965, c 96, §73; HRS §383-92; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next